pl: Metoda przetwarzania miodu: Ekstrahowany na zimno; Kremowany; Filtrowany; Z dodatkami; Mikrofiltrowany; Pasteryzowany; Surowy/niepasteryzowany; Ultrafiltrowany; Niefiltrowany; Inna
nl: Honingverwerkingsmethode: Koudgeslingerd; Geroerd/geslingerd; Gefilterd; Geïnfuseerd; Microgefilterd; Gepasteuriseerd; Rauw/ongepasteuriseerd; Ultra-gefilterd; Ongefilterd; Overig
ko: 꿀 가공 방식: 냉추출; 크림화/스펀; 여과; 인퓨즈드; 마이크로 여과; 살균 처리; 생꿀/비살균 처리; 초미세 여과; 무여과; 기타
lt-LT: Medaus apdorojimo būdas: Šalto spaudimo; Kreminis / suktas; Filtruotas; Prisotintas; Mikrofiltruotas; Pasterizuotas; Žalias / nepasterizuotas; Ultrafiltruotas; Nefiltruotas; Kita
bg-BG: Метод за обработка на мед: Студено екстрахиран; Кремообразен/центрофугиран; Филтриран; Инфузиран; Микрофилтриран; Пастьоризиран; Суров/непастьоризиран; Ултрафилтриран; Нефилтриран; Друго
cs: Způsob zpracování medu: Extrahovaný za studena; Pastovaný/šlehaný; Filtrovaný; Ochucený (infuzovaný); Mikrofiltrovaný; Pasterizovaný; Surový/nepasterizovaný; Ultrafiltrovaný; Nefiltrovaný; Jiný
el: Μέθοδος επεξεργασίας μελιού: Ψυχρής έκθλιψης; Κρεμώδες/Αναδευμένο; Φιλτραρισμένο; Εμπλουτισμένο; Μικροφιλτραρισμένο; Παστεριωμένο; Ακατέργαστο/Μη παστεριωμένο; Υπερφιλτραρισμένο; Μη φιλτραρισμένο; Άλλο
hu: Méz feldolgozási módja: Hidegen sajtolt; Krémesített; Szűrt; Ízesített; Mikroszűrt; Pasztőrözött; Nyers/pasztőrözetlen; Ultraszűrt; Szűretlen; Egyéb
tr: Bal işleme yöntemi: Soğuk sıkım; Krema/çırpılmış; Filtrelenmiş; Aromalı; Mikro filtrelenmiş; Pastörize; Ham/pastörize edilmemiş; Ultra filtrelenmiş; Filtrelenmemiş; Diğer
de: Honigverarbeitungsmethode: Kaltgeschleudert; Cremig gerührt; Gefiltert; Aromatisiert; Mikrogefiltert; Pasteurisiert; Roh/Unpasteurisiert; Ultrafiltriert; Ungefiltert; Andere
zh-CN: 蜂蜜加工方法: 冷萃; 制成奶油状/离心分离; 过滤; 泡制; 微滤; 巴氏杀菌; 原蜜/未经巴氏杀菌; 超滤; 未过滤; 其他
da: Forarbejdningsmetode for honning: Koldtslynget; Rørt/slynget; Filtreret; Infuseret; Mikrofiltreret; Pasteuriseret; Rå/upasteuriseret; Ultrafiltreret; Ufiltreret; Andet
zh-TW: 蜂蜜加工方式: 冷萃; 膏狀/旋轉分離; 過濾; 浸泡/風味; 微濾; 巴氏殺菌; 生蜜/未經高溫殺菌; 超濾; 未過濾; 其他
hr-HR: Metoda obrade meda: Hladno vrcani; Kremasti/tučeni; Filtrirani; Obogaćeni; Mikrofiltrirani; Pasterizirani; Sirovi/nepasterizirani; Ultrafiltrirani; Nefiltrirani; Ostalo
vi: Phương pháp chế biến mật ong: Chiết xuất lạnh; Quay/làm kem; Đã lọc; Ngâm; Vi lọc; Thanh trùng; Thô/chưa thanh trùng; Siêu lọc; Chưa lọc; Khác
pt-PT: Método de processamento do mel: Extraído a frio; Cremoso/centrifugado; Filtrado; Infundido; Microfiltrado; Pasteurizado; Cru/não pasteurizado; Ultrafiltrado; Não filtrado; Outro
fr: Procédé de transformation du miel: Extrait à froid; Crémeux/filé; Filtré; Infusé; Microfiltré; Pasteurisé; Brut/non pasteurisé; Ultrafiltré; Non filtré; Autre
sl-SI: Način predelave medu: Hladno točen; Kremni/mešani; Filtriran; Z dodatki; Mikrofiltriran; Pasteriziran; Surov/nepasteriziran; Ultrafiltriran; Nefiltriran; Drugo
ru: Метод обработки меда: Холодный отжим; Кремование/взбивание; Фильтрованный; С добавками; Микрофильтрованный; Пастеризованный; Сырой/непастеризованный; Ультрафильтрованный; Нефильтрованный; Другое
fi: Hunajan käsittelymenetelmä: Kylmälingottu; Vaahdotettu/lingottu; Suodatettu; Maustettu; Mikrosuodatettu; Pastöroitu; Raaka/pastöroimaton; Ultrasuodatettu; Suodattamaton; Muu
sk-SK: Spôsob spracovania medu: Extrahovaný za studena; Krémovaný/odstreďovaný; Filtrovaný; Lúhovaný; Mikrofiltrovaný; Pasterizovaný; Surový/nepasterizovaný; Ultrafiltrovaný; Nefiltrovaný; Iné
ja: ハニー加工方法: 低温抽出; クリーム/スパン; ろ過; インフューズド; マイクロろ過; 低温殺菌; 生 / 非加熱; 限外ろ過; 無ろ過; その他
pt-BR: Método de processamento do mel: Extraído a frio; Cremoso/centrifugado; Filtrado; Em infusão; Microfiltrado; Pasteurizado; Cru/não pasteurizado; Ultrafiltrado; Não filtrado; Outros
ro-RO: Metodă de procesare a mierii: Extrasă la rece; Cremă/centrifugată; Filtrată; Infuzată; Microfiltrată; Pasteurizată; Crudă/nepasteurizată; Ultrafiltrată; Nefiltrată; Altele
it: Metodo di lavorazione del Honey: Estratto a freddo; Mantecato/Centrifugato; Filtrato; Infuso; Microfiltrato; Pastorizzato; Grezzo/Non pastorizzato; Ultrafiltrato; Non filtrato; Altro
th: วิธีการแปรรูปน้ำผึ้ง: สกัดเย็น; ปั่นครีม; กรอง; อินฟิวส์ (หมักผสม); กรองละเอียด; พาสเจอไรซ์; ดิบ/ไม่ผ่านการพาสเจอไรซ์; กรองแบบอัลตราฟิลเตรชัน; ไม่กรอง; อื่นๆ
en: Honey processing method: Cold-extracted; Creamed/spun; Filtered; Infused; Micro-filtered; Pasteurized; Raw/unpasteurized; Ultra-filtered; Unfiltered; Other
nb: Behandlingsmetode for honning: Kaldslynget; Kremet/rørt; Filtrert; Tilsatt smak; Mikrofiltrert; Pasteurisert; Rå/upasteurisert; Ultrafiltrert; Ufiltrert; Annet
es: Método de procesamiento de miel: Extraído en frío; Cremoso/centrifugado; Filtrado; Infusionado; Microfiltrado; Pasteurizado; Crudo/sin pasteurizar; Ultrafiltrado; Sin filtrar; Otro
sv: Process för honungsframställning: Kallslungad; Krämifierad/rörd; Filtrerad; Smaksatt; Mikrofiltrerad; Pastöriserad; Rå/opastöriserad; Ultrafiltrerad; Ofiltrerad; Annat